bg-BG: Тип свързване на върха на стреличката за дартс: 1/4 инча; 2BA; Преходен връх; Чрез притискане; С натискане; Бърз връх (Quick Point); С навиване; Система с втулка; Swiss Point; Други
pl: Typ połączenia grotu lotki: 1/4 cala; 2BA; Grot konwersyjny; Wciskany; Na wcisk; Quick Point; Wkręcany; System tulejkowy; Swiss Point; Inne
it: Tipo di relazione della punta della freccetta: 1/4 di pollice; 2BA; Punta di conversione; A pressione; Ad innesto; Quick Point; A vite; Sistema a manicotto; Swiss Point; Altro
tr: Dart ucu bağlantı türü: 1/4 inç; 2BA; Dönüştürme ucu; Pres geçme; Geçmeli; Hızlı uç; Vidalı; Kılıf sistemi; Swiss Point; Diğer
sk-SK: Typ pripojenia hrotu šípky: 1/4 palca; 2BA; Konverzný hrot; Zalisovaný; Zásuvný; Quick Point; Skrutkovací; Objímkový systém; Swiss Point; Iné
zh-TW: 飛鏢鏢尖連接類型: 1/4 吋; 2BA; 轉接針; 壓入式; 推入式; Quick Point; 鎖入式; 套管系統; Swiss Point; 其他
sv: Dartspetskopplingstyp: 1/4 tum; 2BA; Konverteringsspets; Inpressad; Intryckt; Quick Point; Iskruvad; Hylssystem; Swiss Point; Övrigt
pt-PT: Tipo de ligação da ponta do dardo: 1/4 de polegada; 2BA; Ponta de conversão; De pressão; De encaixe; Quick Point; De aparafusar; Sistema de manga; Swiss Point; Outro
hr-HR: Tip veza vrha strelice: 1/4 inča; 2BA; Vrh za pretvorbu; Na utiskivanje; Utično; Quick Point; Na uvrtanje; Sustav s navlakom; Swiss Point; Ostalo
th: ประเภทการเชื่อมต่อของหัวลูกดอก: 1/4 นิ้ว; 2BA; หัวแปลง; กดอัดเข้า; กดเข้า; ควิกพอยต์; ขันสกรู; ระบบปลอกสวม; สวิสพอยต์; อื่นๆ
cs: Typ propojení hrotu šipky: 1/4 palce; 2BA; Konverzní hrot; Nalisovací; Zasunovací; Quick Point; Šroubovací; Zásuvný systém; Swiss Point; Jiné
pt-BR: Tipo de conexão da ponta do dardo: 1/4 de polegada; 2BA; Ponta de conversão; Pressão; Encaixe; Quick Point; Rosqueável; Sistema de luva; Swiss Point; Outro
ja: ダーツチップ連携タイプ: 1/4インチ; 2BA; コンバージョンポイント; 圧入式; プッシュイン; クイックポイント; ねじ込み式; スリーブシステム; スイスポイント; その他
nb: Dartspiss forbindelsestype: 1/4 tomme; 2BA; Konverteringsspiss; Press-inn; Trykk-inn; Quick Point; Skru-inn; Hylsesystem; Swiss Point; Annet
el: Τύπος σύνδεσης αιχμής βέλους: 1/4 ίντσας; 2BA; Μύτη μετατροπής; Πρεσαριστό; Κουμπωτό; Quick Point; Βιδωτό; Σύστημα με χιτώνιο; Swiss Point; Άλλο
zh-CN: 镖尖连接方式: 1/4 英寸; 2BA; 转换尖; 压入式; 插入式; 快速更换尖 (Quick Point); 旋入式; 套筒系统; Swiss Point; 其他
en: Dart tip connection type: 1/4 inch; 2BA; Conversion point; Press-in; Push-in; Quick Point; Screw-in; Sleeve system; Swiss Point; Other
fr: Type de fixation de pointe de fléchette: 1/4 po; 2BA; Pointe de conversion; À enfoncer; À insérer; Quick Point; À visser; Système à manchon; Swiss Point; Autre
hu: Dart hegy csatlakozás típusa: 1/4 hüvelyk; 2BA; Átalakító hegy; Bepréselhető; Benyomós; Quick Point; Becsavarható; Hüvelyes rendszer; Swiss Point; Egyéb
ro-RO: Tip de conexiune vârf dart: 1/4 inchi; 2BA; Vârf de conversie; Prin presare; Prin apăsare; Quick Point; Prin înșurubare; Sistem cu manșon; Swiss Point; Altele
ko: 다트 팁 연결 방식: 1/4인치; 2BA; 컨버전 포인트; 프레스인; 푸시인; Quick Point; 스크류인; 슬리브 시스템; Swiss Point; 기타
de: Anschlussart der Dartspitze: 1/4 Zoll; 2BA; Conversion-Point; Press-In; Push-In; Quick Point; Screw-In; Sleeve-System; Swiss Point; Sonstige
lt-LT: Smiginio antgalio jungties tipas: 1/4 col.; 2BA; Konversijos antgalis; Įspaudžiamas; Įstumiamas; Greitasis antgalis („Quick Point“); Įsukamas; Įvorės sistema; „Swiss Point“; Kita
sl-SI: Vrsta povezovanja konic pikado puščic: 1/4 palca; 2BA; Konverzijska konica; Vtisljivo; Potisno; Quick Point; Privijačeno; Sistem s tulcem; Swiss Point; Drugo
es: Tipo de conexión de la punta del dardo: 1/4 de pulgada; 2BA; Punta de conversión; A presión; A presión; Quick Point; De rosca; Sistema de funda; Swiss Point; Otro
vi: Loại kết nối đầu phi tiêu: 1/4 inch; 2BA; Mũi chuyển đổi; Nhấn vào; Đẩy vào; Quick Point; Bắt vít; Hệ thống ống lót; Swiss Point; Khác
fi: Tikan kärkityyppi: 1/4 tuumaa; 2BA; Muuntokärki; Puristettava; Työnnettävä; Quick Point; Ruuvattava; Holkkijärjestelmä; Swiss Point; Muu
da: Tilkoblingstype til dartpilspids: 1/4 tomme; 2BA; Konverteringsspids; Press-in; Push-in; Quick Point; Med gevind; Sleeve-system; Swiss Point; Andet
ru: Тип соединения наконечника дротика: 1/4 дюйма; 2BA; Переходник; Запрессованный; Вставной; Quick Point; Ввинчивающийся; Система втулок; Swiss Point; Другое
nl: Dartpunt verbindingstype: 1/4 inch; 2BA; Conversiepunt; Press-in; Push-in; Quick Point; Inschroefbaar; Sleevesysteem; Swiss Point; Overige